Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2102
Garbage disposal plants, systems and solid waste disposal areas; tax; when authorized.

The cost thereof may be defrayed by the levy of a tax not to exceed ten and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such city or village in any one year or, when such tax is insufficient for such purpose, by the issuance of bonds of the municipality.

Laws 1947, c. 54, § 2, p. 183;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 37, p. 952;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 83;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 84.